Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 1. Opening Conservatorships

§ 3-3-101.
Petition for involuntary appointment of conservator.

Any person may file with the clerk a petition for the involuntary appointment of a conservator. The petition appointment shall state:

The name, age and address of the proposed ward;

The status of the proposed ward as a minor, incompetent person or a mentally incompetent person and the reasons for the petition;

The name and address of the proposed conservator, and his qualification to serve as conservator;

The name and address of the person or institution having the care, custody or control of the proposed ward;

The fact that the residence of the proposed ward is in the county, or is a nonresident, or that his residence is unknown;

The fact that the best interest of the proposed ward requires the appointment of a conservator in Wyoming;

The estimated current value of the real estate, the estimated value of the personal property and the estimated gross annual income of the estate;

Any money payable or to become payable to the proposed ward from any source; and

The interests of the petitioner.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appointment proper. —

Trial court
did not err in appointing a conservator because the 70-year-old ward,
who had been diagnosed with dementia, was living under horrifying
conditions in a house filled with hoarded articles and trash; his
home had been without running water since 2006 and had no toilet or
shower facilities. Sands v. Brown (In re Sands), 2013 WY 60, 301 P.3d 128,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2013).

§ 3-3-102.
Notice; when required; governed by rules of civil procedure.

Notice of filing of a petition for appointment of an involuntary conservator shall be served on the proposed ward, his custodian, the proposed conservator and upon the proposed ward’s parents, agent or fiduciary under a known power of attorney, adult children and spouse who are known or who can be discovered with due diligence, except:

When a petition is filed under W.S.

3-2-106

,

3-3-107

or

3-3-301

; or

When for good cause the court determines that no notice is necessary when the proposed ward is under the age of eighteen (18) years.

Notice shall be served on any other person as ordered by the court.

Notice shall be given in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure and as ordered by the court.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2; 1999, ch. 150, § 1; 2017 ch. 117, § 2, effective January 1, 2018.

The 2017 amendment

, effective January 1, 2018, in (a), added “agent or fiduciary under a known power of attorney.”

§ 3-3-103.
Pleadings and trial; rules of civil procedure.

After the petition is filed, all proceedings are governed by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure and the Wyoming Rules of Evidence. Petitioner, the proposed ward or his custodian may demand a jury trial as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-104.
Appointment of conservator.

The court may appoint a conservator if the allegations of the petition as to the status of the proposed ward and the necessity for the appointment of a conservator are proved by a preponderance of the evidence.

The order appointing a conservator shall state the findings of the court, including:

Reasons why the ward is in need of a conservator;

Appointment of the conservator;

The duration of the appointment for a specified term or permanent, subject to W.S.

3-3-1101

;

The limited or plenary duties of the conservator.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 114, § 4, provides:

Transitional provisions. “(a) An order appointing a limited guardian or a limited conservator under W.S.

3-4-101

through 3-4-109 shall remain in effect until the date of termination specified in the order, or until otherwise terminated as provided by this subsection, but shall not be modified or extended. An order entered under W.S.

3-4-101

through 3-4-109 shall terminate upon entry of an order appointing a guardian or conservator under any other provision of title 3 of the Wyoming statutes.

“(b) In the case of an order creating a guardianship under W.S.

3-2-104

entered prior to the effective date of this act [July 1, 1998], the duration of the appointment of the guardian shall be deemed to be permanent and the guardian may exercise the plenary duties authorized by statute unless otherwise specified in the order.

“(c) In the case of an order creating a conservatorship under W.S.

3-3-104

entered prior to the effective date of this act, the duration of the appointment of the conservator shall be deemed to be permanent and the conservator may exercise the plenary duties authorized by statute unless otherwise specified in the order.

“(d) In the case of a temporary guardianship or a temporary conservatorship created prior to, and continuing on the effective date of this act, the maximum duration periods specified by W.S.

3-2-106

and

3-3-107

shall apply as if the order creating the temporary guardianship or the temporary conservatorship had been entered on the effective date of this act.”

Continuation of conservatorship was proper. —

Trial court
did not err in continuing a guardianship and conservatorship shortly
after the guardian was appointed because the 70-year-old ward, who
had been diagnosed with dementia, was living under horrifying conditions
in a house filled with hoarded articles and trash; his home had been
without running water since 2006 and had no toilet or shower facilities. Sands v. Brown (In re Sands), 2013 WY 60, 301 P.3d 128,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2013).

Cited

in

McNeel v. McNeel, 2005 WY 36, 109 P.3d 510,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(2005).

§ 3-3-105.
Preference for appointment of conservator of a minor.

The appointment of a qualified and suitable conservator of a minor shall be made in the following order of preference:

The parent or parents of the minor;

The person nominated as conservator in the will of the custodial parent;

The person requested by a minor who has reached fourteen (14) years of age;

Any other person who is willing to serve as conservator.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 3-3-106.
Appointment of conservator on voluntary petition.

The court may appoint a conservator upon the petition by the proposed ward if:

The petitioner has reached the age of fourteen (14) years; and

The court determines that the appointment of a conservator is in the best interest of the petitioner.

The petition shall state whether a notice of involuntary petition for the appointment of a conservator has been served on the proposed ward.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

§ 3-3-107.
Appointment of a temporary conservator.

Upon the filing of a petition for a temporary conservator and after a hearing the court may appoint a temporary conservator subject to any notice and conditions the court prescribes.

Every order appointing a temporary conservator shall be limited to not more than ninety (90) days. The court may order an extension of the temporary conservatorship for not more than an additional ninety (90) days, or conversion to a guardianship or conservatorship in accordance with W.S.

3-2-105

or

3-3-101

through

3-3-106

.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 114, § 4, provides:

Transitional provisions. “(a) An order appointing a limited guardian or a limited conservator under W.S.

3-4-101

through 3-4-109 shall remain in effect until the date of termination specified in the order, or until otherwise terminated as provided by this subsection, but shall not be modified or extended. An order entered under W.S.

3-4-101

through 3-4-109 shall terminate upon entry of an order appointing a guardian or conservator under any other provision of title 3 of the Wyoming statutes.

“(b) In the case of an order creating a guardianship under W.S.

3-2-104

entered prior to the effective date of this act [July 1, 1998], the duration of the appointment of the guardian shall be deemed to be permanent and the guardian may exercise the plenary duties authorized by statute unless otherwise specified in the order.

“(c) In the case of an order creating a conservatorship under W.S.

3-3-104

entered prior to the effective date of this act, the duration of the appointment of the conservator shall be deemed to be permanent and the conservator may exercise the plenary duties authorized by statute unless otherwise specified in the order.

“(d) In the case of a temporary guardianship or a temporary conservatorship created prior to, and continuing on the effective date of this act, the maximum duration periods specified by W.S.

3-2-106

and

3-3-107

shall apply as if the order creating the temporary guardianship or the temporary conservatorship had been entered on the effective date of this act.”

§ 3-3-108.
Payment or delivery of property in lieu of conservatorship.

Any person under a duty to pay or deliver money or personal property to a minor for whom no conservator has been appointed may pay not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) per annum or may deliver property of a value not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) to:

The minor who is married or is emancipated;

Any person having the care and custody of the minor with whom the minor resides;

A guardian of the minor; or

A financial institution incident to a deposit in a federally insured interest bearing account in the sole name of the minor with notice of the deposit to the minor.

The payment or the delivery provided in W.S.

3-3-108

shall not be made if the person has actual knowledge that a conservator has been appointed or proceedings for appointment of a conservator of the estate of the minor are pending.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, persons other than the minor or any financial institution under paragraph (a)(iv) of this section, receiving money or property for a minor, shall apply the money or property to the support, care and education of the minor. The money or property shall not be used as compensation to the recipient except for reimbursement of out-of-pocket expenses for goods and services necessary for the minor’s support. Any excess sums shall be invested for future support of the minor and any balance not so used and any property received for the minor shall be turned over to the minor when he attains majority, is married or is emancipated.

If the person receiving money or property for a minor is the parent of the minor, he shall discharge fully his parental duties of support before reimbursing himself for out-of-pocket expenses as provided under subsection (c) of this section.

Persons who pay or deliver money or property in accordance with provisions of this section are not responsible for the proper application thereof by the recipient.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.